tools/tts/test/yamls/generation.yaml
---
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-tts-gt-norm.hfstol

Tests:
  Normaliser generation tests:  # words that normaliser needs to generate
    kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: kaksi
    kaksitostu+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: kaksitostu
    kymmene+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: kymmenen
    kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Par: kolmie
    kolmetostu+Num+Card+Sg+Par: kolmietostu
    kolmastostu+A+Ord+Sg+Par: kolmattutostu
    kaheksan+Num+Card+Sg+Par: kaheksua
    kolmietuhattu+Num+Card+Sg+Par: kolmietuhattu
    "nellikymmendy kaheksa tuhattu+Num+Card+Sg+Par": "nelliäkymmendy kaheksua tuhattu"
    "kolmekymmendy yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Par": "kolmiekymmendy yhty"
    "kuuzikymmendy nelli+Num+Card+Sg+Par": "kuuttukymmendy nelliä"
    nellikymmendy+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: nellälkymmenel
    viizi+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: viijel
    nelli+Num+Card+Sg+Ter: nelläh
    yheksäkymmendy+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: yheksähkymmeneh
    yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: yhteh
    kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: kolmeh
    kymmene+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: kymmenel
    kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: kolmel
    viizitostu+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: viidehtostu
    viijestostu+A+Ord+Sg+Nom: viijestostu
    "kaksikymmendy yheksä+Num+Card+Sg+Ill": "kahtehkymmeneh yheksäh"
    nellikymmendy+Num+Card+Sg+Par: nelliäkymmendy
    kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: kahtes
    "tuhat yheksäsadua seiččiekymmen+Num+Card+Sg+Nom": "tuhat yheksäsadua seiččiekymmen"
    "seiččiekymmen viizi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom": "seiččiekymmen viizi"
    "kahteskymmenes nelläs+A+Ord+Sg+Nom": "kahteskymmenes nelläs"
    yheksäs+A+Ord+Sg+Par: yheksätty
    kolmaskymmenes+A+Ord+Sg+Nom: kolmaskymmenes
    kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Par: kolmattu
    "yheksäkymen kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Nom": "yheksäkymmen kolme"
